Washington statutes.
RCW 13.22.005

Finding—Intent—2020 c 333.

(1) The legislature finds that prolonged isolation for juveniles may cause harm. Prolonged solitary confinement has also been shown as ineffective at reducing behavioral incidents and may increase anxiety and anger in youth.

(2) Creating alternative solutions to solitary confinement for juveniles will further protect the well-being of juveniles in all detention facilities and institutions and enhance the rehabilitative goals of Washington's juvenile justice system. Chapter 333, Laws of 2020 seeks to end the use of solitary confinement in juvenile facilities when used as a form of punishment or retaliation. Chapter 333, Laws of 2020 also seeks to limit placement in isolation, except in the circumstances outlined in RCW 13.22.020. Juvenile institutions and detention facilities must implement a system of graduated interventions to avoid the use of solitary confinement. Less restrictive forms of confinement should be used to regulate the behavior of juveniles in institutions and detention facilities.

(3) The legislature intends to prevent the use of solitary confinement and, in the limited instances of isolation, ensure that the use advances the rehabilitative goals of Washington's juvenile justice system, and that it is not used as a punitive measure.

[ 2020 c 333 s 1.]